Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 1 General Provisions

17-1-1.
Short title.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the “Election Law”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

17-1-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-1-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes this title, except as may otherwise be required by the context:

“Election” means the filling of any public office or the determination of any public question by vote of the electorate, and includes without limitation any state, town, or city office or question, and any political party primary election for the nomination of any candidate for public office; except that it shall not include a financial town meeting or a meeting to elect officers of a fire, water, or sewer district;

“General election” means an election held on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in even numbered years for the election of members of the general assembly and/or for the election of general officers, and/or for the election of presidential electors for president/vice-president of the United States;

“General officer” means an officer designated as a general officer by chapter 2 of this title;

“Independent candidate” means a candidate who has no affiliation with any political party;

“Local board” means a town or city board of canvassers, board of canvassers and registration, canvassing authority, or any other local board, commission, or officer empowered by law to have custody of the permanent registration records;

“Local election” means any election limited to the electorate of any city or town, or any part, at which any city, town, ward, or district officers are to be chosen, or any elective meeting at which a question is to be submitted to the voters of a city, town, or any subdivision of a city or town, but it shall not include a financial town meeting;

“Party member” means any person who is a member of a designated political party pursuant to §

17-9.1-23

;

“Party voter” means any qualified voter who is eligible to vote at the primary election of a political party;

“Political party” or “party” means: (i) any political organization which, at the next preceding general election for the election of general officers, nominated a candidate for governor, and whose candidate for governor at the election polled at least five percent (5%) of the entire vote cast in the state for governor, or (ii) any political organization which at the next preceding general election for the election of a president of the United States nominated a candidate for president and whose candidate for president at the election polled at least five percent (5%) of the entire vote cast in the state for president, or (iii) any political organization which, on petition forms provided to the chairperson of the organization by the state board of elections, obtains the signatures and addresses of that number of registered qualified voters equal to five percent (5%) of the entire vote cast in the state for governor or president in the immediately preceding general election. All the signatures must be obtained no earlier than January 1 of the year in which the political organization desires to place a candidate or candidates on any ballot as a “party” candidate. If the political organization wishes to select its nominees in a primary election, the petitions, bearing the requisite number of valid signatures, shall be presented to the appropriate local boards of canvassers no later than June 1 of the same year. If the petitions are validated by the local boards as containing the requisite number of valid signatures, the political organization shall be deemed to be a political party for all elections held during the year and may select its nominees in a primary election. If the political organization does not wish to select its nominees in a primary election, then the petitions need not be returned to local boards of canvassers until August 1 of the same year. An organization qualifying as a political party through the petition process shall qualify as a political party only during the year in which signatures are obtained unless the candidates for governor or president of the United States of the party at a general election held in the year, shall receive five percent (5%) of the vote as provided in this subdivision for either governor or president of the United States. If the candidates do not receive five percent (5%) of the vote, the organization shall no longer qualify as a political party unless and until it shall, in a subsequent year, once again qualify by the submission of petitions;

“Polling place” means the room in which any election or elective meeting is conducted;

“Primary election” means any election to select the candidates of a political party;

“Proposition” or “public question” means any question put to a referendum of the electorate of the entire state or any part of it;

“Qualified voter” means any person who is eligible to vote under the requirements of age, residence, and citizenship prescribed by the state constitution and who is duly registered to vote, or who is exempt from registration, pursuant to this title, and who is not otherwise disqualified as a voter pursuant to law;

“Special election” means any election other than a local election or primary election which is not held on a general election day;

“State board” means the state board of elections constituted pursuant to this title;

“State election” means any election at which any presidential electors, senator or representatives in congress, general officers of the state, or members of the general assembly are to be chosen, or at which a public question or an amendment to the Constitution is submitted to the electors of the state;

“State officer” means the governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, general treasurer, state senator, and state representative;

“Vacancy in office” means the condition resulting from any failure to elect or appoint an eligible and qualified person to public office, or the failure of any person duly elected or appointed to qualify, or from the death, resignation, or removal of an incumbent prior to the expiration of his or her term of office and where no fixed term is prescribed upon the death, resignation, or removal;

“Voting list” means the complete list of all voters prepared from the information contained in the original permanent registration records in the possession of the local board of canvassers;

“Warden” includes “moderator” and vice versa;

Words importing the masculine gender shall include the feminine gender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 1; P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

17-8-1

,

17-12-1

; G.L. 1956, §

17-1-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 536, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 235, § 1.

17-1-2.1.
Signature identification.

For the purpose of assisting registrars and other persons in identifying a voter’s signature, whenever in this title and whenever under any home rule charter enacted pursuant to article XIII, § 1 of the Constitution of the state of Rhode Island a voter’s signature is required, space shall be provided and so labeled for the voter to print his or her legal name. However, failure of the voter to print his or her name shall not invalidate the signature if otherwise legible. This section shall not apply to the original voter’s registration form and other forms where the name of the voter is typed and/or printed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 14; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 1.

17-1-3.
Eligibility to vote.

Every citizen of the United States who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, whose residence as defined in §

17-1-3.1

has been in this state for at least thirty (30) days, and in the town or city and voting district in which that person desires to cast his or her vote at least thirty (30) days next preceding the election, and who is registered in that city or town and voting district at least thirty (30) days next preceding any election, shall be entitled to vote in the election; provided, a person may vote in a primary election only if that person is eligible under the provisions of this title. A person who has not registered to vote, or whose registration has been canceled pursuant to §

17-10-1

, may cast a vote for president and vice-president on election day at his or her city or town hall or at an alternate location designated by the board of canvassers, and approved by the board of elections, where such location is deemed necessary to better accommodate such voters. The casting of that vote shall commence the process of voter registration and subject the person voting to the requirements and penalties of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 84, § 1.

17-1-3.1.
Residence for voting purposes.

A person’s residence for voting purposes is his or her fixed and established domicile. The determinant of one’s domicile is that person’s factual physical presence in the voting district on a regular basis incorporating an intention to reside for an indefinite period. This domicile is the place to which, upon temporary absence, he or she has the intention of returning. Once acquired, this domicile continues until another domicile is established. A person can have only one domicile, and the domicile shall not be considered lost solely by reason of absence for any of the following reasons:

Employment or service outside of the state intimately connected with military operations or with the federal government, including the spouse and dependents of an elector so employed;

Confinement in a correctional facility;

Being a patient in a hospital, convalescent home, nursing home or rest home, or like facility; or

Attendance as a student at an academic institution, including the spouse and dependents of an elector who is a student.

The following shall be considered prima facie evidence of a person’s residence for voting purposes:

The address furnished to the division of motor vehicles for the voter’s operator’s license;

The address from which the voter’s motor vehicle is registered;

The address from which the voter filed his last federal income tax return;

The address from which the voter filed his last state income tax return;

The address furnished to the companies from which the voter has obtained retail credit cards;

The address furnished to the financial institutions where the voter maintains accounts;

The address furnished to the tax collector and/or assessor in those communities where the voter owns taxable real or personal property for the purpose of notification to him or her;

The address furnished to the insurance companies with which the voter maintains policies;

The address furnished to the voter’s employer;

The address furnished by the voter to any business, professional, union, or fraternal organizations of which he or she is a member;

The address furnished to governmental agencies with which the voter has contact;

The address of a hospital, convalescent home, nursing home or rest home, or like facility at which the voter has been a patient or resident for the preceding thirty (30) days or longer;

The address furnished to the United States postal service on a change of address form as verified by the United States postal service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 142, § 1.

17-1-3.2 — 17-1-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 438, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 2, effective January 1, 1995.

17-1-5.
Effect of special statutes.

The provisions of any chapter or section under this title are subject to the provisions of any special statutes or charters respecting any particular town or city, none of which are repealed by this title; provided, that insofar as any special statute or charters adapted prior to April 22, 1935, conflicts with the provisions of chapter 19 of this title, the provisions of chapter 19 shall prevail; and provided, further, that insofar as any special statute or charter provision conflicts with the provisions of §

17-14-7

,

17-14-9

, or

17-19-7.1

, the provisions of §

17-14-7

,

17-14-9

, or

17-19-7.1

shall prevail. Notwithstanding any charter provision of any city or town to the contrary, all local elections and special elections, as these terms are defined under §§

17-1-2(6)

and

17-1-2(14)

, shall be held on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday in any month.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 328, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-25-1

; G.L., §

17-1-5

, as enacted by P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 252, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 1.

17-1-5.1.
Municipal and state employees holding elective public office.

A municipal employee may hold a state elective office or a municipal elective office; provided, that except as authorized pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, no municipal employee may hold a municipal elective office in the city or town in which he or she is employed, and a state employee may hold any municipal elective office. Any provision in any state law, municipal ordinance, or city or town charter prohibiting a municipal employee from holding state elective office or municipal elective office, other than in the town where he or she is employed, or a state employee from holding a municipal elective office is declared null and void.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to school teachers of the individual cities and towns as defined in title 16.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the first sentence of subsection (a) of this section, a city or town may, by charter or ordinance, permit a municipal employee of that city or town to hold the office of school committee person in that city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 518, § 1.

17-1-6.
Scope of title.

This title shall apply to all elections, except as may otherwise be provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-1-7.
Uniform deadlines.

Notwithstanding any other time specified for the filing of any paper or the doing of any act pursuant to this title, a uniform deadline of 4:00 p.m. is established; provided, that applications for emergency mail ballots must be received by 4:00 p.m. on the day prior to an election or primary. If any filing deadline falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the deadline shall be construed to fall on the next subsequent business day; provided, that this does not apply to registration to vote thirty (30) days prior to an election or primary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 167, § 1.

17-1-7.1.
Filings to be originals.

Filings made under this title at the secretary of state’s office shall be considered valid only if they bear original signatures and shall not include any telegram, cablegram, telephone call, electronically transmitted documents, or similar communications.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 98, § 2.

17-1-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 3.

17-1-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 276, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 293, § 1, effective July 5, 2008; P.L. 2008, ch. 411, § 1, effective July 8, 2008.

17-1-10.
Lincoln town officials — Inauguration date.

The voters of the town of Lincoln may vote, at the next regularly scheduled election to be held on November 7, 2000, on whether to modify the Town Home Rule Charter to change the inauguration date of officials of the town of Lincoln from the first Tuesday of December in even-numbered years to the first Tuesday of January in odd-numbered years to coincide with the inaugurations of state officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 277, § 1.